src-fst-morphology-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
## Plains Cree pronouns

There are more pronoums to be added here.

LEXICON Pronoun 

LEXICON Personal  \\
nîtha+Pron+Pers+1Sg:nîtha # ; 
kîtha+Pron+Pers+2Sg:kîtha # ; 

LEXICON Interrogative   \\
awîna+Pron+Interr+A+Sg:awîna # "who,whose" ; 
awînak+Pron+Interr+A+Sg:awînak # "who,whose" ; 
awîna+Pron+Interr+A+Pl:awîna # "who,whose" ; 
awînak+Pron+Interr+A+Pl:awînak # "who,whose" ; 
awîniki+Pron+Interr+A+Pl+Var/East:awîniki # "who" ; 
awînikik+Pron+Interr+A+Pl+Var/East:awînikik # "who" ; 
awîna+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:awîna # "who,whose" ; 
awînithiwa+Pron+Interr+A+Obv+Var/East:awînithiwa # "who" ; 
awînaka+Pron+Interr+A+Obv+Var/East:awînaka # "who" ; 

LEXICON Indefinite 
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Sg:awiyak # "someone" ; 
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Pl:awiyakak # "some people" ;

LEXICON Definite  \\

LEXICON Demonstrative    \\
ANIMATE \\
awa+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Sg:awa # "this" ; 
ôko+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Pl:ôko # "these" ; 
ôho+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Obv:ôho # "this/these" ; 

INANIMATE \\

ôma+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this" ; 
ôho+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Pl:ôho # "these" ; 
ômîthiw+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Obv:ômîthiw # "this/these" ; 

ôma+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this one" ; 
ôho+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Pl:ôho # "these one" ; 
ômîthiw+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Obv:ômîthiw # "this/these one(s)" ; 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cwd/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
